District of Columbia statutes.
47-1036.01

National Education Association — Real property subject to District taxation.

Notwithstanding any provision of any federally granted charter or any other provision of law, the real property of the National Education Association located in the District of Columbia shall be subject to taxation by the District of Columbia in the same manner as any similar organization.

Nov. 19, 1997, 111 Stat. 2188, Pub. L. 105-100, § 158
1981 Ed., § 47-1036.1.